Louisiana, session 2026, SB503.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part III of Chapter 20-A of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 51:1776.1 through 1776.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III. MINOR EXPLOITATION PREVENTION
§1776.1. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Minor Exploitation
Prevention Act".
§1776.2. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Adult" means an account holder who is or is reasonably estimated
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1497 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 503
to be eighteen years of age or older.
(2) "Age category" means a classification of an individual based on age
or estimated age, including a description of the user as a minor, adult, or being
within a given age range.
(3) "Age signal" means a signal indicating an account holder's age
category, including the method by which such determination was made.
(4) "Application" means a software program designed to run on a
connected device and distributed through an application distributor. The term
shall not include internet browsers or browser extensions.
(5) "Application distributor" means a digital platform or software
through which applications are distributed to users.
(6) "Application distribution provider" means a person or entity that
owns or operates an application distributor.
(7) "Developer" means a person or entity that creates, owns, or controls
an application.
(8) "Covered application" means an application that provides a different
experience to minors than to adults or is intended for adult use only.
(9) "Connected device" means a device capable of connecting to the
internet and downloading applications, including smartphones, tablets, gaming
consoles, and virtual reality devices.
(10) "Minor" means an account holder who is or is reasonably estimated
to be under eighteen years of age.
§1776.3. Age requirements
A. An application distribution provider shall do all of the following:
(1) Require each account holder to declare his age when creating an
account with the application distribution provider.
(2) Use commercially reasonable efforts to determine an account holder's
age category.
(3) Provide an account holder with a mechanism to obtain his age
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1497 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 503
category and the ability to request an update if he believes the age category is
incorrect.
(4) Provide each developer of a covered application the ability to call an
age signal where the account holder or the account holder's parent has agreed
to share the account holder's age category. An application distribution provider
shall only provide an age signal for an account holder who has provided consent
to sharing the account holder's age category with the developer or where a
parent has provided consent on behalf of the account holder who is a minor.
B. A application distribution provider acting in good faith shall not be
liable for any of the following:
(1) Inaccurate age signals.
(2) Any conduct by a developer of a covered application that receives any
age signal, except where the developer and application distribution provider are
controlled by the same entity.
(3) Failing to provide technical ability to call an age signal due to any
reasonable technical limitations.
(4) Failing to provide the age signal to developers that do not adhere to
reasonable safety standards and application distributor policies.
C.(1) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit an application distribution
provider from using multiple commercially reasonable methods to obtain,
estimate, or provide the age category of an account holder.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall restrict an application distribution
provider's ability to satisfy the provisions of this Part by obtaining a minor
account holder's age from the minor's parent.
§1776.4. Application distributor provider; duties
A. An application distribution provider shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide the account holder's parent or developer of a covered
application with the ability to prevent account holders who are not adults from
acquiring or using the developer's covered application from the application
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1497 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 503
distributor.
(2) Provide a developer the ability to disclose parental controls for
covered application through a centralized product page or user interface that
provides information about a covered application.
(3) Comply with the obligations and requirements for its own covered
application for which the application distribution provider is also the developer.
B. An application distributor provider shall not use data collected from
a third-party covered application in the course of compliance with this Part to
give the application distribution provider preference relative to those of a third
party, or to otherwise use the data in an anti-competitive manner.
§1776.5. Application developer; duties
A. A developer of a covered application shall:
(1) Report to the application distribution provider whether the
application provides a different experience for adults than for users who are not
adults or is intended only for adults.
(2) Provide tools to help parents support a minor using the covered
application unless the application is intended for adult use only.
(3) Use commercially reasonable efforts to determine whether a user is
an adult or a minor with a reasonable level of certainty.
(4) Make reasonable efforts, proportionate to the risks, to ensure that
users who are minors shall not engage in any activity that has been restricted
for adults only.
(5) Obtain consent prior to permitting minor account holders from
accessing content or enabling features the developer has designated as
unsuitable for use by minors without parental guidance or supervision.
B. A developer of a covered application shall not deliver personalized
advertising to minors.
C.(1) If the developer chooses to call an age signal facilitated by an
application distribution provider, the developer shall request the minimum
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1497 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 503
amount of information needed for purposes of compliance with this Part.
(2) If the developer chooses to call an age signal facilitated by an
application distribution provider, the developer shall not:
(a) Willfully disregard any information regarding an individual's age or
age category that is otherwise available to the developer.
(b) Share the information obtained from the age signal with third
parties, except for a service provider, but only if necessary for the service
provider to implement any safety measure or privacy protections for minors or
otherwise required by law.
(c) Use the age signal for any purpose beyond that intended by this Part,
including but not limited to using the age signal to back into or attempt to back
into a users date of birth.
D. Nothing in this Section shall require the developer to determine
whether a user is an adult or a minor, provided the developer and an
application distribution provider are controlled by the same entity.
§1776.6. Developer; liability
A. A developer of a covered application is liable for correctly identifying
whether its application is a covered application pursuant to this Part. No
application distributor is required to proactively identify any covered
application, and an application distributor shall not be held liable in any case
where a developer provides inaccurate information about its application.
B. A developer of a covered application shall not be liable for an
erroneous age signal provided by an application distribution provider, if it
makes a reasonable effort, taking into consideration available technology, to
properly use the age signal and carry out other age assurance, if needed, as
proportionate to the risks presented to any person using its applications.
§1776.7. Enforcement
A. The attorney general shall have exclusive authority to enforce the
provisions of this Part.
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1497 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 503
B. Nothing in this Part or any other provision of law shall be interpreted
to serve as the basis for a private right of action.
C. The attorney general may initiate an action and seek a civil penalty
of up to one thousand dollars for each violation of this Part.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2028.